California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(a) To execute the writ of possession of personal property, the levying officer shall search for the property specified in the writ and, if the property is in the possession of the judgment debtor or an agent of the judgment debtor, take custody of the property in the same manner as a levy under a writ of execution on such property in the possession of the judgment debtor. Custody of personal property used as a dwelling shall be taken as provided by Section 700.080. Custody of property in a private place shall be taken as provided by Section 699.030. If the levying officer obtains possession of the property specified in the writ
of possession, the levying officer shall deliver the property to the judgment creditor in satisfaction of the judgment.

(b) If the property specified in the writ of possession cannot be taken into custody, the levying officer shall make a demand upon the judgment debtor for the property if the judgment debtor can be located. If custody of the property is not then obtained, the levying officer shall so state in the return. Thereafter the judgment for the possession of the property may be enforced in the same manner as a money judgment for the value of the property as specified in the judgment or a supplemental order.

(c) The writ of possession of personal property may, under the circumstances described in subdivision (b), be treated as a writ of execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

714.030.

(a) After entry of a judgment for possession of personal property, and whether or not a writ of possession of personal property has been issued, the judgment creditor may apply to the court for an order directing the judgment debtor to transfer possession of the property or documentary evidence of title to the property or both to the judgment creditor. The application shall be made on noticed motion if the court so directs or a court rule so requires. Otherwise, the application may be made ex parte.

(b) The court may issue an order pursuant to this section upon a
showing of need for the order.

(c) The order shall be personally served on the judgment debtor and shall contain a notice to the judgment debtor that failure to comply with the order may subject the judgment debtor to being held in contempt of court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Judgment for Possession of Real Property [715.010. - 715.050.]

715.010.

(a) A judgment for possession of real property may be enforced by a writ of possession of real property issued pursuant to Section 712.010. The application for the writ shall provide a place to indicate that the writ applies to all tenants, subtenants, if any, name of claimants, if any, and any other occupants of the premises.

(b) In addition to the information required by Section 712.020, the writ of possession of real property shall contain the following:

(1) A description of the real property, possession of which is to be delivered to the judgment creditor in satisfaction of the judgment.

(2) A statement that if the real property is not vacated within five days from the date of service of a copy of the writ on the occupant or, if the copy of the writ is posted, within five days from the date a copy of the writ is served on the judgment debtor, the levying officer will remove the occupants from the real property and place the judgment creditor in possession.

(3) A statement that any personal property, except a mobilehome, remaining on the real property after the judgment creditor has been placed in possession will be sold or otherwise disposed of in accordance with Section 1174 unless the judgment debtor or other owner pays the judgment creditor the reasonable cost of
storage and takes possession of the personal property not later than 15 days after the time the judgment creditor takes possession of the real property.

(4) The date the complaint was filed in the action that resulted in the judgment of possession.

(5) The date or dates on which the court will hear objections to enforcement of a judgment of possession that are filed pursuant to Section 1174.3, unless a summons, complaint, and prejudgment claim of right to possession were served upon the occupants in accordance with Section 415.46.

(6) The daily rental value of the property as of the date the complaint for unlawful detainer was filed unless a summons, complaint, and prejudgment claim of right of possession were served upon the occupants in accordance with Section 415.46.

(7) If a summons, complaint, and prejudgment claim of right to possession were served upon the occupants in accordance with Section 415.46, a statement that the writ applies to all tenants, subtenants, if any, named claimants, if any, and any other occupants of the premises.

(c) At the time the writ of possession is served or posted, the levying officer shall also serve or post a copy of the form for a claim of right to possession, unless a summons, complaint, and prejudgment claim of right to possession were served upon the occupants in accordance with Section 415.46.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

715.020.

To execute the writ of possession of real property:

(a) The levying officer shall serve a copy of the writ of possession on one occupant of the property. Service on the occupant shall be made by leaving the copy of the writ with the occupant personally or, in the occupant’s absence, with a person of suitable age and discretion found upon the property when service is attempted who is either an employee or agent of the occupant or a member of the occupant’s household. 

(b) If unable to serve an
occupant described in subdivision (a) at the time service is attempted, the levying officer shall execute the writ of possession by posting a copy of the writ in a conspicuous place on the property and serving a copy of the writ of possession on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. If the judgment debtor’s address is not known, the copy of the writ may be served by mailing it to the address of the property. 

(c) If the judgment debtor, members of the judgment debtor’s household, and any other occupants holding under the judgment debtor do not vacate the property within five days from the date of service on an occupant pursuant to subdivision (a) or on the judgment debtor pursuant to subdivision (b), the levying officer shall remove the occupants from the property and place the judgment creditor in possession. The provisions of Section 684.120 extending time do not apply to the five-day period specified in this
subdivision. 

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), unless the person is named in the writ, the levying officer may not remove any person from the property who claims a right to possession of the property accruing prior to the commencement of the unlawful detainer action or who claims to have been in possession of the property on the date of the filing of the unlawful detainer action. However, if the summons, complaint, and prejudgment claim of right to possession were served upon the occupants in accordance with Section 415.46, no occupant of the premises, whether or not the occupant is named in the judgment for possession, may object to the enforcement of the judgment as prescribed in Section 1174.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 57, Sec. 4.   Effective June 17, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

715.030.

The disposition of personal property remaining on the real property after the judgment creditor is placed in possession thereof pursuant to the writ of possession is governed by subdivisions (e) to (m), inclusive, of Section 1174. For this purpose, references in Section 1174 and in provisions incorporated by reference in Section 1174 to the “landlord” shall be deemed to be references to the judgment creditor and references to the “tenant” shall be deemed to be references to the judgment debtor or other occupant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

715.040.

(a) A registered process server may execute the writ of possession of real property as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 715.020 if a proper writ of possession is delivered to the sheriff or marshal and that officer does not execute the writ as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 715.020 within three days (Saturday, Sunday, and legal holidays excluded) from the day the writ is delivered to that officer. If the writ is not executed within that time, the levying officer shall upon request give the writ to the
judgment creditor or to a registered process server designated by the judgment creditor.

(b) Within five days after executing the writ under this section, all of the following shall be filed with the levying officer:

(1) The writ of possession of real property.

(2) An affidavit of the registered process server stating the manner in which the writ was executed.

(3) Proof of service of the writ.

(4) Instructions in writing, as required by the provisions of Section 687.010.

(c) If the writ is executed by a registered process server, the levying officer shall perform all other duties under the writ and shall return the writ to
the court.

(d) The fee for services of a registered process server under this section may, in the court’s discretion, be allowed as a recoverable cost upon a motion pursuant to Section 685.080. If allowed, the amount of the fee to be allowed is governed by Section 1033.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

715.050.

Except with respect to enforcement of a judgment for money, a writ of possession issued pursuant to a judgment for possession in an unlawful detainer action shall be enforced pursuant to this chapter without delay, notwithstanding receipt of notice of the filing by the defendant of a bankruptcy proceeding.

This section does not apply to a writ of possession issued for possession of a mobilehome or manufactured home, as those terms are defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1161a, and does not apply to a writ of
possession issued for possession of real property in a mobilehome park subject to the Mobilehome Residency Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 798) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code), or to a manufactured housing community, as defined in Section 18801 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Judgment for Sale of Property [716.010. - 716.030.]

716.010.

(a) A judgment for sale of real or personal property may be enforced by a writ of sale issued pursuant to Section 712.010.

(b) In addition to the information required by Section 712.020, the writ of sale shall contain a description of the property to be sold in satisfaction of the judgment for sale.

(c) The writ of sale delivered to the levying officer shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the judgment for sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

716.020.

To execute the writ of sale, the levying officer shall:

(a) Levy upon the property described in the writ of sale in the manner prescribed by Article 4 (commencing with Section 700.010) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 for levy under a writ of execution.

(b) Except as otherwise ordered by the court, give notice of sale and sell the property described in the writ of sale in the manner prescribed by Article 6 (commencing with Section 701.510) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 for giving notice and selling under a writ of execution.

(c) Apply the proceeds of the sale of the property in conformity with the judgment for sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

716.030.

(a) If a writ of sale is issued, the judgment creditor may apply to the court ex parte, or on noticed motion if the court so directs or a court rule so requires, for an order directing the judgment debtor to transfer to the levying officer:

(1) Possession of the property to be sold if the prescribed method of levy is by taking the property into custody.

(2) Possession of any documentary evidence of title to property to be sold. An order pursuant to this paragraph may be served when the property is
levied upon or thereafter.

(b) The court may issue an order pursuant to this section upon a showing of need for the order.

(c) The order shall be personally served on the judgment debtor and shall contain a notice to the judgment debtor that failure to comply with the order may subject the judgment debtor to being held in contempt of court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Other Judgments [717.010. - 717.010.]

717.010.

A judgment not otherwise enforceable pursuant to this title may be enforced by personally serving a certified copy of the judgment on the person required to obey it and invoking the power of the court to punish for contempt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 4. THIRD-PARTY CLAIMS AND RELATED PROCEDURES [720.010. - 720.800.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [720.010. - 720.030.]

720.010.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.020.

“Creditor” means the judgment creditor or, in the case of a levy under a writ of attachment or prejudgment writ of possession of personal property, the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.030.

“Debtor” means the judgment debtor or, in the case of a levy under a writ of attachment or prejudgment writ of possession of personal property, the defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Third-Party Claims of Ownership and Possession [720.110. - 720.170.]

720.110.

A third person claiming ownership or the right to possession of property may make a third-party claim under this chapter in any of the following cases if the interest claimed is superior to the creditor’s lien on the property:

(a) Where real property has been levied upon under a writ of attachment or a writ of execution.

(b) Where personal property has been levied upon under a writ of attachment, a writ of execution, a prejudgment or postjudgment writ of possession, or a writ of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.120.

A person making a third-party claim under this chapter shall file the claim with the levying officer, together with two copies of the claim, after levy on the property but before the levying officer does any of the following:

(a) Sells the property.

(b) Delivers possession of the property to the creditor.

(c) Pays proceeds of collection to the creditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.130.

(a) The third-party claim shall be executed under oath and shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name of the third person and an address in this state where service by mail may be made on the third person.

(2) A description of the property in which an interest is claimed.

(3) A description of the interest claimed, including a statement of the facts upon which the claim is based.

(4) An estimate of the market value of the interest claimed.

(b) A copy of any writing upon which the claim is based shall be attached to the third-party claim. At a hearing on the third-party claim, the court in its discretion may exclude from evidence any writing a copy of which was not attached to the third-party claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.140.

(a) Not later than five days after the third-party claim is filed with the levying officer, the levying officer shall serve the following personally or by mail on the creditor:

(1) A copy of the third-party claim.

(2) A statement whether the third person has filed an undertaking to release the property pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 720.610).

(3) If the third person has filed an undertaking to release the property, a
notice that the property will be released unless, within the time allowed as specified in the notice, the creditor objects to the undertaking.

(4) If the third person has not filed an undertaking to release the property, a notice that the property will be released unless, within the time allowed as specified in the notice, the creditor files with the levying officer an undertaking that satisfies the requirements of Section 720.160.

(b) The time allowed the creditor for objecting to the third person’s undertaking to release the property or for filing an undertaking is 10 days after service under subdivision (a).

(c) Within the time allowed for service on the creditor under subdivision (a), the levying officer shall serve a copy of the papers specified in subdivision (a) on the debtor. Service shall be made personally
or by mail.

(d) The levying officer may serve the copy of the third-party claim and the statement and notice pursuant to this section notwithstanding any defect, informality, or insufficiency of the claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.150.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, if a third-party claim is timely filed, the levying officer may not do any of the following with respect to the property in which an interest is claimed:

(1) Sell the property.

(2) Deliver possession of the property to the creditor.

(3) Pay proceeds of collection to the creditor.

(b) The interest of the third person in the
property levied upon is not affected by the third person’s failure to file a third-party claim under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.160.

(a) If the creditor files with the levying officer an undertaking that satisfies the requirements of this section within the time allowed under subdivision (b) of Section 720.140:

(1) The levying officer shall execute the writ in the manner provided by law unless the third person files an undertaking to release the property pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 720.610).

(2) After sale, payment, or
delivery of the property pursuant to the writ, the property is free of all claims of the third person for which the creditor has given the undertaking.

(b) Subject to Sections 720.770 and 996.010, unless the creditor elects to file an undertaking in a larger amount, the amount of the undertaking filed by the creditor under this section shall be in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or twice the amount of the execution lien as of the date of levy or other enforcement lien as of the date it was created, whichever is the lesser amount.

(c) An undertaking given by the creditor under this chapter shall:

(1) Be made in favor of the third person.

(2) Indemnify the third person against any loss, liability, damages, costs, and attorney’s fees,
incurred by reason of the enforcement proceedings.

(3) Be conditioned on a final judgment that the third person owns or has the right of possession of the property.

(d) If the creditor is a public entity exempt from giving an undertaking, the public entity shall, in lieu of filing the undertaking, file with the levying officer a notice stating that the public entity opposes the claim of the third person. When so filed, the notice is deemed to satisfy the requirement of this section that an undertaking be filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 812, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

720.170.

(a) In a case where the third person has not filed with the levying officer an undertaking to release the property pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 720.610), if the creditor does not within the time allowed under subdivision (b) of Section 720.140 file with the levying officer an undertaking (or file a notice if the creditor is a public entity) that satisfies the requirements of Section 720.160, the levying officer shall release the property unless it is to be held under another lien or unless otherwise ordered by the court.

(b) Except as otherwise
provided in this section, release is governed by Section 699.060.

(c) If personal property that has been taken into custody is to be released to the debtor pursuant to Section 699.060 and the debtor has not claimed the property within 10 days after notice was served pursuant to Section 699.060, the levying officer shall release the property to the third person making the claim.

(d) A hearing may be had on the third-party claim pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 720.310) notwithstanding the release of the property pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Third-Party Claim of Security Interest or Lien [720.210. - 720.290.]

720.210.

(a) Where personal property has been levied upon under a writ of attachment, a writ of execution, a prejudgment or postjudgment writ of possession, or a writ of sale, a third person claiming a security interest in or lien on the personal property may make a third-party claim under this chapter if the security interest or lien claimed is superior to the creditor’s lien on the property. 

(b)A secured party claiming a security interest in fixtures may make a third-party claim pursuant to this chapter if the security interest claimed is superior to the creditor’s lien
on the property. For this purpose, references in this division to “personal property” shall be deemed references to fixtures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.220.

A person making a third-party claim under this chapter shall file the claim with the levying officer, together with two copies of the claim, after levy on the personal property but before the levying officer does any of the following:

(a) Sells the property.

(b) Delivers possession of the property to the creditor.

(c) Pays proceeds of collection to the creditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.230.

(a) The third-party claim shall be executed under oath and shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name of the secured party or lienholder and an address in this state where service by mail may be made on the secured party or lienholder.

(2) A description of the personal property in which a security interest or lien is claimed.

(3) A detailed description of the security interest or lien claimed, including a statement of the facts upon
which it is based.

(4) A statement of the total amount of sums due or to accrue under the security interest or lien and the applicable rate of interest on amounts due.

(b) In the case of a security interest, a copy of the security agreement and any financing statement shall be attached to the third-party claim. In the case of a lien, a copy of any writing upon which the claim is based shall be attached to the third-party claim. At a hearing on the third-party claim, the court in its discretion may exclude from evidence any writing a copy of which was not attached to the third-party claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.240.

(a) Not later than five days after the third-party claim is filed with the levying officer, the levying officer shall serve the following personally or by mail on the creditor:

(1) A copy of the third-party claim.

(2) A statement whether the third person has filed an undertaking to release the property pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 720.610).

(3) If the third person has filed an undertaking to release the property, a
notice that the property will be released unless, within the time allowed as specified in the notice, the creditor objects to the undertaking.

(4) If the third person has not filed an undertaking to release the property, a notice that the property will be released unless, within the time allowed as specified in the notice, the creditor does one of the following:

(A) Files with the levying officer an undertaking that satisfies the requirements of Section 720.260 and a statement under Section 720.280.

(B) Deposits with the levying officer the amount claimed plus interest at the applicable rate to the estimated date of tender to the secured party or lienholder.

(b) The time allowed the creditor for objecting to the third person’s undertaking to release the
property or for filing an undertaking and statement or making a deposit pursuant to subdivision (a) is 10 days after service under subdivision (a).

(c) Within the time allowed for service on the creditor under subdivision (a), the levying officer shall serve a copy of the papers specified in subdivision (a) on the debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(d) The levying officer may serve the copy of the third-party claim and the statement and notice pursuant to this section notwithstanding any defect, informality, or insufficiency of the claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.250.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, if a third-party claim is timely filed, the levying officer may not do any of the following with respect to the personal property in which the security interest or lien is claimed:

(1) Sell the property.

(2) Deliver possession of the property to the creditor.

(3) Pay proceeds of collection to the creditor.

(b) The interest of a
secured party or lienholder in the property levied upon is not affected by the failure of the secured party or lienholder to file a third-party claim under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.260.

(a) If the creditor within the time allowed under subdivision (b) of Section 720.240 either files with the levying officer an undertaking that satisfies the requirements of this section and a statement that satisfies the requirements of Section 720.280 or makes a deposit with the levying officer of the amount claimed under Section 720.230:

(1) The levying officer shall execute the writ in the manner provided by law unless, in a case where the creditor has filed an
undertaking, the secured party or lienholder files an undertaking to release the property pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 720.610).

(2) After sale, payment, or delivery of the property pursuant to the writ, the property is free of all claims or liens of the secured party or lienholder for which the creditor has given the undertaking or made the deposit.

(b) Subject to Sections 720.770 and 996.010, unless the creditor elects to file an undertaking in a larger amount, the amount of the undertaking filed by the creditor under this section shall be in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or twice the amount of the execution lien as of the date of levy or other enforcement lien as of the date it was created, whichever is the lesser amount.

(c) An undertaking given by the creditor under this chapter
shall:

(1) Be made in favor of the secured party or lienholder.

(2) Indemnify the secured party or lienholder against any loss, liability, damages, costs, and attorney’s fees, incurred by reason of the enforcement proceedings.

(3) Be conditioned on a final judgment that the security interest or lien of the third person is entitled to priority over the creditor’s lien.

(d) If the creditor is a public entity exempt from giving an undertaking, the public entity shall, in lieu of filing the undertaking, file with the levying officer a notice stating that the public entity opposes the claim of the third person. When so filed, the notice is deemed to satisfy the requirement of this section that an undertaking be filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 812, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

720.270.

(a) In a case where the third person has not filed with the levying officer an undertaking to release the property pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 720.610), if the creditor does not within the time allowed under subdivision (b) of Section 720.240 file with the levying officer an undertaking (or file a notice if the creditor is a public entity) that satisfies the requirements of Section 720.260 and a statement under Section 720.280, or deposit with the levying officer the amount claimed under Section 720.230, the levying officer shall release the personal property unless it is to be held under another lien or unless
otherwise ordered by the court.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, release is governed by Section 699.060.

(c) If property that has been taken into custody is to be released to the debtor pursuant to Section 699.060 and the debtor has not claimed the property within 10 days after notice was served pursuant to Section 699.060, the levying officer shall release the property to the secured party or lienholder making the claim.

(d) A hearing may be had on the third-party claim pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 720.310) notwithstanding the release of the property pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.280.

At the time the creditor files an undertaking with the levying officer in response to a third-party claim by a secured party, the creditor shall do all of the following:

(a) File with the levying officer a statement executed under oath that the security interest is invalid, that the security interest is not entitled to priority over the creditor’s lien, or that the amount demanded in the claim exceeds the amount to which the secured party is entitled, for the reasons specified therein.

(b) Serve a copy of the statement on
the secured party. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(c) Serve a copy of the statement on the debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.290.

(a) If the levying officer receives a sufficient deposit from the creditor, the levying officer shall promptly tender or pay the deposit to the secured party or lienholder who made the third-party claim except that, if the deposit is made by personal check, the levying officer is allowed a reasonable time for the check to clear.

(b) If the tender is accepted, the interest of the secured party or lienholder in the property for which deposit is made passes to the creditor making the deposit and, on distribution of any proceeds under Section 701.810, the creditor who
makes the deposit shall be entitled to the proceeds to the extent of the deposit in the priority of the interest for which the deposit is made.

(c) If the tender is refused, the amount of the deposit shall be deposited with the county treasurer payable to the order of the secured party or lienholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Hearing on Third-Party Claim [720.310. - 720.430.]

720.310.

(a) Not later than 15 days after the third-party claim is filed with the levying officer pursuant to Section 720.120 or 720.220, or 15 days after filing an undertaking pursuant to Section 720.610, either the creditor or the third person may petition the court for a hearing to determine the validity of the third-party claim and the proper disposition of the property that is the subject of the claim.

(b) The hearing may be held whether or not an undertaking has been filed but not if a deposit has been made pursuant to Section 720.260.

(c) The hearing shall be held within 20 days after the filing of the petition unless continued by the court for good cause shown.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

720.320.

(a) At the time prescribed in subdivision (b) of Section 1005, the petitioner shall do both of the following:

(1) Serve notice of the time and place of the hearing on the creditor or the third person (whichever person is not the petitioner) and on the debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(2) File a copy of the notice of hearing with the levying officer.

(b) The notice of the hearing shall include a statement that the
purpose of the hearing is to determine the validity of the third-party claim and the proper disposition of the property that is the subject of the third-party claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 693, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

720.330.

Promptly after receipt of the notice of the hearing on the third-party claim, the levying officer shall file the following papers with the court:

(a) The third-party claim that was filed with the levying officer pursuant to Section 720.120 or 720.220.

(b) Any statement filed by the creditor with the levying officer pursuant to Section 720.280 in opposition to the third-party claim of a secured party.

(c) Any undertaking of the creditor filed with the levying
officer pursuant to Section 720.160 or Section 720.260.

(d) Any undertaking to release filed by a third person pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with section 720.610).

(e) Any notice filed by a public entity pursuant to Section 720.160 or 720.260.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.340.

If the creditor has not filed a statement with the levying officer pursuant to Section 720.280 in opposition to a third-party claim by a secured party:

(a) In a case where the creditor petitions for a hearing on the third-party claim, the creditor shall file the statement with the court at the time the petition is filed and shall serve a copy thereof on the secured party with notice of the hearing served pursuant to Section 720.320.

(b) In a case where the secured party has petitioned for a hearing on the third-party claim,
the creditor shall file the statement with the court and serve a copy of the statement on the secured party not later than five days before the date set for the hearing. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.350.

(a) Subject to the power of the court to permit an amendment in the interest of justice:

(1) The third-party claim constitutes the pleading of the third person.

(2) In the case of a third-party claim by a secured party, the creditor’s statement constitutes the pleading of the creditor.

(b) A third-party claim of ownership, right to possession, or a lien, shall be deemed controverted by the creditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.360.

At a hearing on a third-party claim, the third person has the burden of proof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.370.

If the petition for a hearing was made by the third person, neither the petition nor the proceedings pursuant thereto may be dismissed without the consent of the creditor. If the petition for a hearing was made by the creditor, neither the petition nor the proceedings pursuant thereto may be dismissed without the consent of the third person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.380.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the court may make an order staying the sale of the property under a writ or enjoining any transfer or other disposition of the property levied upon under a writ until proceedings for the determination of the rights of a third person can be commenced and prosecuted to termination and may require such undertaking as it considers necessary as a condition for making the order.

(b) After the filing of a third-party claim, notwithstanding Sections 720.160 and 720.260, the creditor, the debtor, or the third person may
apply to the court for an order staying the sale of the property under a writ or enjoining any transfer or other disposition of the property until proceedings under this article can be commenced and prosecuted to termination. The application shall be made on noticed motion if the court so directs or a court rule otherwise so requires. Otherwise, the application may be made ex parte.

(c) An order made pursuant to this section may be modified or vacated by the court at any time prior to the termination of the proceedings upon such terms as are just.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.390.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall give judgment determining the validity of the third-party claim and may order the disposition of the property or its proceeds in accordance with the respective interests of the parties. Subject to Section 720.420, the judgment is conclusive between the parties to the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.400.

No findings are required in proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.410.

There is no right to a jury trial in a proceeding pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

720.420.
